New York, session 2025-2026, S247.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new article 169 to 2 read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 169 4 VISION IMPAIRMENT SPECIALISTS 5 Section 8900. Introduction. 6 8901. Definitions. 7 8902. Use of titles. 8 8903. State board for vision impairment specialists. 9 8904. Requirements for a license with a specialization as an 10 orientation and mobility specialist. 11 8905. Requirements for a license with a specialization as a 12 vision rehabilitation therapist. 13 8906. Limited permits. 14 8907. Exempt persons. 15 8908. Special provisions. 16 8909. Separability. 17 § 8900. Introduction. This article applies to the profession of vision 18 impairment specialists, and provides for the licensing of orientation 19 and mobility specialists and vision rehabilitation therapists. The 20 general provisions for all professions contained in article one hundred 21 thirty of this title shall apply to this article. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00914-01-5 S. 247 2 1 § 8901. Definitions. For purposes of this article, the following terms 2 shall have the following meanings: 3 1. The practice of "vision impairment specialist" shall mean providing 4 assessment and evaluation of, and training for, persons who are visually 5 impaired when such assessment, evaluation and training incorporates the 6 full range of specialized skills and tasks subsumed in the specializa- 7 tions of the profession defined in this section as: (a) orientation and 8 mobility training, and (b) vision rehabilitation therapy. Such services 9 shall be rendered on the prescription or referral which may be directive 10 as to treatment by a licensed physician, nurse practitioner, ophthalmol- 11 ogist or optometrist, provided however that no such treatment directive 12 and low vision examination shall be required when the person being 13 referred has been diagnosed within the previous twelve months as visual- 14 ly impaired, blind or legally blind as those terms are defined in subdi- 15 vision six of this section and such services are being rendered consist- 16 ent with that diagnosis, prescription or referral. Vision rehabilitation 17 therapists, and orientation and mobility specialists may not prescribe 18 optical low vision devices. 19 2. The practice of "vision impairment specialist" shall mean one who 20 specializes in orientation and mobility training and/or vision rehabili- 21 tation therapy. 22 3. The practice of "orientation and mobility training" shall mean: 23 (a) the assessment of individual needs of persons who are visually 24 impaired for skills training in methods of safe movement and in strate- 25 gies to gather required environmental and spatial information; (b) the 26 development of appropriate integrated service plans tailored to meet 27 such individual needs as identified in such assessment process; (c) the 28 provision of training in, and utilization of (i) equipment and adaptive 29 devices intended and designed for use by persons who are visually 30 impaired, and (ii) specialized techniques adapted for persons who are 31 visually impaired, including but not limited to orientation; sensory 32 development; systems of safe movement, including long cane techniques; 33 resource identification and, as appropriate, professional referrals; 34 and, in applied settings, reinforcing instruction for the use of optical 35 devices as prescribed by optometrists and ophthalmologists; and (d) the 36 evaluation of clients receiving such specialized training. 37 4. The practice of "vision rehabilitation therapy" shall mean: (a) the 38 assessment of individual needs of persons who are visually impaired for 39 skills training in independent living and communications; (b) the devel- 40 opment of appropriate integrated service plans tailored to meet such 41 individual needs as identified in such assessment process; (c) the 42 provision of training in, and utilization of (i) equipment and adaptive 43 devices intended and designed for use by persons who are visually 44 impaired, including, in applied settings, reinforcing instruction for 45 the use of optical devices as prescribed by optometrists or ophthalmolo- 46 gists, and (ii) specialized techniques adapted for persons who are visu- 47 ally impaired, including but not limited to Braille and other communi- 48 cation skills; adapted computer technology; personal management skills; 49 home management skills; problem solving skills; resource management and, 50 as appropriate, professional referrals; and (d) the evaluation of 51 persons receiving such specialized training. 52 5. "Applied settings" means those locations where persons who are 53 visually impaired engage in day-to-day activities utilizing the tools 54 supplied and techniques taught by the licensed practitioners defined in 55 this article. S. 247 3 1 6. "Visually impaired" means a person who is totally blind, legally 2 blind or partially sighted. A person who is totally blind is one who has 3 no useable vision. A person who is legally blind is one who satisfies 4 the definition set forth in subdivision b of section three of chapter 5 four hundred fifteen of the laws of nineteen hundred thirteen. A person 6 who is partially sighted is one who has functional vision impairment 7 that constitutes a significant limitation of visual capability resulting 8 from disease, trauma, or congenital condition, that cannot be fully 9 ameliorated by standard refractive correction, medication, or surgery, 10 and that is manifested by one or more of the following: insufficient 11 visual resolution, inadequate field of vision or reduced peak contrast 12 sensitivity. 13 7. "Board" shall mean the state board for vision impairment special- 14 ists as provided for in section eighty-nine hundred three of this arti- 15 cle. 16 § 8902. Use of titles. Only a person licensed or otherwise authorized 17 under this article shall be authorized to practice as a vision impair- 18 ment specialist or use the title "licensed orientation and mobility 19 specialist" or "licensed vision rehabilitation therapist" in connection 20 with their name or with any trade name in the conduct of their profes- 21 sion. 22 § 8903. State board for vision impairment specialists. A state board 23 for vision impairment specialists shall be appointed by the board of 24 regents upon the recommendation of the commissioner for the purpose of 25 assisting the board of regents and the department on matters of profes- 26 sional licensing and professional conduct in accordance with section 27 sixty-five hundred eight of this title. The board shall consist of not 28 less than nine individuals, two of whom shall be licensed orientation 29 and mobility specialists, two of whom shall be licensed vision rehabili- 30 tation therapists, one ophthalmologist, one optometrist, one public 31 representative as defined in paragraph b of subdivision one of section 32 sixty-five hundred eight of this title and two of whom shall be blind 33 representatives of the public at large whose names will be placed in 34 nomination for the board from organizations of the blind or visually 35 impaired. Members of the initial board need not be licensed or certified 36 prior to their appointment to the board, so long as they are certified 37 by a national certifying or accrediting board, acceptable to the depart- 38 ment. Of the members first appointed, two shall be appointed for a 39 three-year term, three shall be appointed for a four-year term, and 40 three shall be appointed for a five-year term. Thereafter all members 41 shall serve for five-year terms. In the event that more than eight 42 members are appointed, a majority of the additional members shall be 43 licensed orientation and mobility specialists and licensed vision reha- 44 bilitation therapists. The members of the board shall select one of 45 themselves as chair to serve for a one-year term. An executive secretary 46 shall be appointed by the board of regents upon the recommendation of 47 the commissioner. 48 § 8904. Requirements for a license with a specialization as an orien- 49 tation and mobility specialist. To qualify for a license as an orien- 50 tation and mobility specialist, an applicant shall fulfill the following 51 requirements: 52 1. Application: file an application with the department; 53 2. Education: have satisfactorily completed an approved curriculum in 54 orientation and mobility services including visual disabilities, vision 55 education, vision impairment or other equivalent program in a baccalau- S. 247 4 1 reate or graduate level program or a foreign equivalent, satisfactory to 2 the department and in accordance with the commissioner's regulations; 3 3. Examination: pass an examination satisfactory to the department in 4 accordance with the commissioner's regulations; 5 4. Age: be at least twenty-one years of age; 6 5. Character: be of good moral character as determined by the depart- 7 ment; and 8 6. Registration: all licensed orientation and mobility specialists 9 shall register triennially with the department in accordance with the 10 commissioner's regulation. 11 7. Fee: a fee of two hundred dollars for an initial license and a fee 12 of one hundred fifty dollars for each triennial registration period. 13 § 8905. Requirements for a license with a specialization as a vision 14 rehabilitation therapist. To qualify for a license as a vision rehabili- 15 tation therapist an applicant shall fulfill the following requirements: 16 1. Application: file an application with the department; 17 2. Education: have satisfactorily completed an approved curriculum in 18 vision rehabilitation therapy including visual disabilities, vision 19 education, vision impairment or other equivalent program in a baccalau- 20 reate or graduate level program, or a foreign equivalent, satisfactory 21 to the department and in accordance with the commissioner's regulations; 22 3. Examination: pass an examination satisfactory to the department in 23 accordance with the commissioner's regulations; 24 4. Age: be at least twenty-one years of age; 25 5. Character: be of good moral character as determined by the depart- 26 ment; and 27 6. Registration: all licensed vision rehabilitation therapists shall 28 register triennially with the department in accordance with the commis- 29 sioner's regulations. 30 7. Fee: a fee of two hundred dollars for an initial license and a fee 31 of one hundred fifty dollars for each triennial registration period. 32 § 8906. Limited permits. The following requirements for a limited 33 permit shall apply to all professions licensed or certified pursuant to 34 this article: 35 1. On the recommendation of the board, the department may issue a 36 limited permit to an applicant who meets the education requirements for 37 licensure, except the examination and/or experience requirements, in 38 accordance with regulations promulgated therefor. 39 2. Limited permits shall be for one year and may be renewed, at the 40 discretion of the department, for one additional year. 41 3. The fee for each limited permit and for each renewal shall be 42 seventy dollars. 43 4. A limited permit holder shall practice only under supervision as 44 determined in accordance with the commissioner's regulations. 45 § 8907. Exempt persons. This article shall not be construed to affect 46 or prevent the following, provided that no title, sign, card or device 47 shall be used in such manner as to tend to convey the impression that 48 the person rendering such service is a licensed vision impairment 49 specialist: 50 1. The practice of licensed vision impairment specialist as an inte- 51 gral part of a program of study by students enrolled in approved educa- 52 tional or training programs in (a) orientation and mobility training or 53 (b) vision rehabilitation therapy. 54 2. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to limit the 55 scopes of practice of any other profession licensed under this title; 56 provided, however, that such practitioners may not hold themselves out S. 247 5 1 under the titles "licensed vision impairment specialist", and/or 2 "licensed vision impairment specialist with a specialization in orien- 3 tation and mobility", and/or "licensed vision impairment specialist with 4 a specialization in vision rehabilitation therapy". 5 3. Nothing in this article shall be construed as prohibiting a person 6 from performing the duties of a licensed vision impairment specialist, 7 in the course of such employment, if such person is employed by a feder- 8 al, state, county, town, city or village agency or other political 9 subdivision except that this exception from licensure shall not apply to 10 persons employed by institutions regulated primarily by the education 11 department. 12 4. This article shall not be construed to prohibit care delivered by 13 any family member, household member or friend, or person employed prima- 14 rily in a domestic capacity who does not hold themself out, or accept 15 employment, as a person licensed to practice as a vision impairment 16 specialist under the provisions of this article; provided, however, that 17 if such person is remunerated, the person does not hold themself out as 18 one who accepts employment for performing such care. 19 5. The instruction in the use of a dog guide. 20 6. Nothing in this article shall be construed as prohibiting a 21 licensed teacher of the visually impaired from performing any of the 22 duties, tasks or responsibilities within that scope of practice. 23 7. The instruction in the use of Braille. 24 § 8908. Special provisions. An individual who meets the requirements 25 for a license as a licensed vision impairment specialist with a special- 26 ization in orientation and mobility and/or vision rehabilitation, except 27 for examination, experience and education, and who is certified or 28 registered by a national certifying body having certification or regis- 29 tration standards acceptable to the commissioner, or an individual who 30 has worked as a vision impairment specialist focused on vision rehabili- 31 tation therapy and/or orientation and mobility in a workplace setting 32 which is primarily devoted to the treatment of individuals with vision 33 loss and blindness for at least three years, may be licensed, without 34 meeting additional requirements as to examination, experience and educa- 35 tion, provided that such individual submits an application to the 36 department within three years of the effective date of this section. 37 § 8909. Separability. If any section of this article, or part thereof, 38 shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, 39 such judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of 40 any other section or part thereof. 41 § 2. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 42 6503-a of the education law, as amended by chapter 554 of the laws of 43 2013, is amended to read as follows: 44 (i) services provided under article one hundred fifty-four, one 45 hundred sixty-three [or], one hundred sixty-seven or article one hundred 46 sixty-nine of this title for which licensure would be required, or 47 § 3. Paragraph a of subdivision 3 of section 6507 of the education 48 law, as amended by chapter 479 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read 49 as follows: 50 a. Establish standards for preprofessional and professional education, 51 experience and licensing examinations as required to implement the arti- 52 cle for each profession. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 53 commissioner shall establish standards requiring that all persons apply- 54 ing, on or after January first, nineteen hundred ninety-one, initially, 55 or for the renewal of, a license, registration or limited permit to be a 56 physician, chiropractor, dentist, registered nurse, podiatrist, optome- S. 247 6 1 trist, psychiatrist, psychologist, licensed master social worker, 2 licensed clinical social worker, licensed creative arts therapist, 3 licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed mental health counse- 4 lor, licensed psychoanalyst, dental hygienist, licensed behavior 5 analyst, [or] certified behavior analyst assistant, or licensed vision 6 impairment specialist shall, in addition to all the other licensure, 7 certification or permit requirements, have completed two hours of 8 coursework or training regarding the identification and reporting of 9 child abuse and maltreatment. The coursework or training shall be 10 obtained from an institution or provider which has been approved by the 11 department to provide such coursework or training. The coursework or 12 training shall include information regarding the physical and behavioral 13 indicators of child abuse and maltreatment and the statutory reporting 14 requirements set out in sections four hundred thirteen through four 15 hundred twenty of the social services law, including but not limited to, 16 when and how a report must be made, what other actions the reporter is 17 mandated or authorized to take, the legal protections afforded repor- 18 ters, and the consequences for failing to report. Such coursework or 19 training may also include information regarding the physical and behav- 20 ioral indicators of the abuse of individuals with developmental disabil- 21 ities and voluntary reporting of abused or neglected adults to the 22 office for people with developmental disabilities or the local adult 23 protective services unit. Each applicant shall provide the department 24 with documentation showing that [he or she has] they have completed the 25 required training. The department shall provide an exemption from the 26 child abuse and maltreatment training requirements to any applicant who 27 requests such an exemption and who shows, to the department's satisfac- 28 tion, that there would be no need because of the nature of [his or her] 29 their practice for [him or her] them to complete such training; 30 § 3-a. Paragraph a of subdivision 3 of section 6507 of the education 31 law, as amended by chapter 733 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 32 as follows: 33 a. Establish standards for preprofessional and professional education, 34 experience and licensing examinations as required to implement the arti- 35 cle for each profession. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 36 commissioner shall establish standards requiring that all persons apply- 37 ing, on or after January first, nineteen hundred ninety-one, initially, 38 or for the renewal of, a license, registration or limited permit to be a 39 physician, chiropractor, dentist, registered nurse, podiatrist, optome- 40 trist, psychiatrist, psychologist, licensed master social worker, 41 licensed clinical social worker, licensed creative arts therapist, 42 licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed mental health counse- 43 lor, licensed psychoanalyst, dental hygienist, licensed behavior 44 analyst, certified behavior analyst assistant, [or] athletic trainer, or 45 licensed vision impairment specialist shall, in addition to all the 46 other licensure, certification or permit requirements, have completed 47 two hours of coursework or training regarding the identification and 48 reporting of child abuse and maltreatment. The coursework or training 49 shall be obtained from an institution or provider which has been 50 approved by the department to provide such coursework or training. The 51 coursework or training shall include information regarding the physical 52 and behavioral indicators of child abuse and maltreatment and the statu- 53 tory reporting requirements set out in sections four hundred thirteen 54 through four hundred twenty of the social services law, including but 55 not limited to, when and how a report must be made, what other actions 56 the reporter is mandated or authorized to take, the legal protections S. 247 7 1 afforded reporters, and the consequences for failing to report. Such 2 coursework or training may also include information regarding the phys- 3 ical and behavioral indicators of the abuse of individuals with develop- 4 mental disabilities and voluntary reporting of abused or neglected 5 adults to the office for people with developmental disabilities or the 6 local adult protective services unit. Each applicant shall provide the 7 department with documentation showing that [he or she has] they have 8 completed the required training. The department shall provide an 9 exemption from the child abuse and maltreatment training requirements to 10 any applicant who requests such an exemption and who shows, to the 11 department's satisfaction, that there would be no need because of the 12 nature of [his or her] their practice for [him or her] them to complete 13 such training; 14 § 4. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 413 of the social 15 services law, as amended by section 7 of part C of chapter 57 of the 16 laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 17 (a) The following persons and officials are required to report or 18 cause a report to be made in accordance with this title when they have 19 reasonable cause to suspect that a child coming before them in their 20 professional or official capacity is an abused or maltreated child, or 21 when they have reasonable cause to suspect that a child is an abused or 22 maltreated child where the parent, guardian, custodian or other person 23 legally responsible for such child comes before them in their profes- 24 sional or official capacity and states from personal knowledge facts, 25 conditions or circumstances which, if correct, would render the child an 26 abused or maltreated child: any physician; registered physician assist- 27 ant; surgeon; medical examiner; coroner; dentist; dental hygienist; 28 osteopath; optometrist; chiropractor; podiatrist; resident; intern; 29 psychologist; registered nurse; social worker; emergency medical techni- 30 cian; licensed creative arts therapist; licensed marriage and family 31 therapist; licensed mental health counselor; licensed psychoanalyst; 32 licensed behavior analyst; certified behavior analyst assistant; 33 licensed vision impairment specialist; hospital personnel engaged in the 34 admission, examination, care or treatment of persons; a Christian 35 Science practitioner; school official, which includes but is not limited 36 to school teacher, school guidance counselor, school psychologist, 37 school social worker, school nurse, school administrator or other school 38 personnel required to hold a teaching or administrative license or 39 certificate; full or part-time compensated school employee required to 40 hold a temporary coaching license or professional coaching certificate; 41 social services worker; employee of a publicly-funded emergency shelter 42 for families with children; director of a children's overnight camp, 43 summer day camp or traveling summer day camp, as such camps are defined 44 in section thirteen hundred ninety-two of the public health law; day 45 care center worker; school-age child care worker; provider of family or 46 group family day care; employee or volunteer in a residential care 47 facility for children that is licensed, certified or operated by the 48 office of children and family services; or any other child care or 49 foster care worker; mental health professional; substance abuse counse- 50 lor; alcoholism counselor; all persons credentialed by the office of 51 [alcoholism and substance abuse services] addiction services and 52 supports; employees, who are expected to have regular and substantial 53 contact with children, of a health home or health home care management 54 agency contracting with a health home as designated by the department of 55 health and authorized under section three hundred sixty-five-l of this 56 chapter or such employees who provide home and community based services S. 247 8 1 under a demonstration program pursuant to section eleven hundred fifteen 2 of the federal social security act who are expected to have regular and 3 substantial contact with children; peace officer; police officer; 4 district attorney or assistant district attorney; investigator employed 5 in the office of a district attorney; or other law enforcement official. 6 § 4-a. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 413 of the social 7 services law, as amended by chapter 733 of the laws of 2023, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 (a) The following persons and officials are required to report or 10 cause a report to be made in accordance with this title when they have 11 reasonable cause to suspect that a child coming before them in their 12 professional or official capacity is an abused or maltreated child, or 13 when they have reasonable cause to suspect that a child is an abused or 14 maltreated child where the parent, guardian, custodian or other person 15 legally responsible for such child comes before them in their profes- 16 sional or official capacity and states from personal knowledge facts, 17 conditions or circumstances which, if correct, would render the child an 18 abused or maltreated child: any physician; registered physician assist- 19 ant; surgeon; medical examiner; coroner; dentist; dental hygienist; 20 osteopath; optometrist; chiropractor; podiatrist; resident; intern; 21 athletic trainer; psychologist; registered nurse; social worker; emer- 22 gency medical technician; licensed creative arts therapist; licensed 23 marriage and family therapist; licensed mental health counselor; 24 licensed psychoanalyst; licensed behavior analyst; certified behavior 25 analyst assistant; licensed vision impairment specialist; hospital 26 personnel engaged in the admission, examination, care or treatment of 27 persons; a Christian Science practitioner; school official, which 28 includes but is not limited to school teacher, school guidance counse- 29 lor, school psychologist, school social worker, school nurse, school 30 administrator or other school personnel required to hold a teaching or 31 administrative license or certificate; full or part-time compensated 32 school employee required to hold a temporary coaching license or profes- 33 sional coaching certificate; social services worker; employee of a publ- 34 icly-funded emergency shelter for families with children; director of a 35 children's overnight camp, summer day camp or traveling summer day camp, 36 as such camps are defined in section thirteen hundred ninety-two of the 37 public health law; day care center worker; school-age child care worker; 38 provider of family or group family day care; employee or volunteer in a 39 residential care facility for children that is licensed, certified or 40 operated by the office of children and family services; or any other 41 child care or foster care worker; mental health professional; substance 42 abuse counselor; alcoholism counselor; all persons credentialed by the 43 office of [alcoholism and substance abuse services] addiction services 44 and supports; employees, who are expected to have regular and substan- 45 tial contact with children, of a health home or health home care manage- 46 ment agency contracting with a health home as designated by the depart- 47 ment of health and authorized under section three hundred sixty-five-l 48 of this chapter or such employees who provide home and community based 49 services under a demonstration program pursuant to section eleven 50 hundred fifteen of the federal social security act who are expected to 51 have regular and substantial contact with children; peace officer; 52 police officer; district attorney or assistant district attorney; inves- 53 tigator employed in the office of a district attorney; or other law 54 enforcement official. 55 § 5. Section 6505-b of the education law, as amended by chapter 10 of 56 the laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: S. 247 9 1 § 6505-b. Course work or training in infection control practices. 2 Every dentist, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, vision 3 impairment specialist, podiatrist, optometrist and dental hygienist 4 practicing in the state shall, on or before July first, nineteen hundred 5 ninety-four and every four years thereafter, complete course work or 6 training appropriate to the professional's practice approved by the 7 department regarding infection control, which shall include sepsis, and 8 barrier precautions, including engineering and work practice controls, 9 in accordance with regulatory standards promulgated by the department, 10 in consultation with the department of health, which shall be consist- 11 ent, as far as appropriate, with such standards adopted by the depart- 12 ment of health pursuant to section two hundred thirty-nine of the public 13 health law to prevent the transmission of HIV, HBV, HCV and infections 14 that could lead to sepsis in the course of professional practice. Each 15 such professional shall document to the department at the time of regis- 16 tration commencing with the first registration after July first, nine- 17 teen hundred ninety-four that the professional has completed course work 18 or training in accordance with this section, provided, however that a 19 professional subject to the provisions of paragraph (f) of subdivision 20 one of section twenty-eight hundred five-k of the public health law 21 shall not be required to so document. The department shall provide an 22 exemption from this requirement to anyone who requests such an exemption 23 and who (i) clearly demonstrates to the department's satisfaction that 24 there would be no need for [him or her] them to complete such course 25 work or training because of the nature of [his or her] their practice or 26 (ii) that [he or she has] they have completed course work or training 27 deemed by the department to be equivalent to the course work or training 28 approved by the department pursuant to this section. The department 29 shall consult with organizations representative of professions, insti- 30 tutions and those with expertise in infection control and HIV, HBV, HCV 31 and infections that could lead to sepsis with respect to the regulatory 32 standards promulgated pursuant to this section. 33 § 5-a. Section 6505-b of the education law, as amended by chapter 733 34 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 35 § 6505-b. Course work or training in infection control practices. 36 Every dentist, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, licensed 37 vision impairment specialist, podiatrist, optometrist, athletic trainer, 38 and dental hygienist practicing in the state shall, on or before July 39 first, nineteen hundred ninety-four and every four years thereafter, 40 complete course work or training appropriate to the professional's prac- 41 tice approved by the department regarding infection control, which shall 42 include sepsis, and barrier precautions, including engineering and work 43 practice controls, in accordance with regulatory standards promulgated 44 by the department, in consultation with the department of health, which 45 shall be consistent, as far as appropriate, with such standards adopted 46 by the department of health pursuant to section two hundred thirty-nine 47 of the public health law to prevent the transmission of HIV, HBV, HCV 48 and infections that could lead to sepsis in the course of professional 49 practice. Each such professional shall document to the department at the 50 time of registration commencing with the first registration after July 51 first, nineteen hundred ninety-four that the professional has completed 52 course work or training in accordance with this section, provided, 53 however that a professional subject to the provisions of paragraph (f) 54 of subdivision one of section twenty-eight hundred five-k of the public 55 health law shall not be required to so document. The department shall 56 provide an exemption from this requirement to anyone who requests such S. 247 10 1 an exemption and who (i) clearly demonstrates to the department's satis- 2 faction that there would be no need for [him or her] them to complete 3 such course work or training because of the nature of [his or her] their 4 practice or (ii) that [he or she has] they have completed course work or 5 training deemed by the department to be equivalent to the course work or 6 training approved by the department pursuant to this section. The 7 department shall consult with organizations representative of 8 professions, institutions and those with expertise in infection control 9 and HIV, HBV, HCV and infections that could lead to sepsis with respect 10 to the regulatory standards promulgated pursuant to this section. 11 § 6. Subdivision (a) of section 1203 of the limited liability company 12 law, as amended by chapter 475 of the laws of 2014, is amended to read 13 as follows: 14 (a) Notwithstanding the education law or any other provision of law, 15 one or more professionals each of whom is authorized by law to render a 16 professional service within the state, or one or more professionals, at 17 least one of whom is authorized by law to render a professional service 18 within the state, may form, or cause to be formed, a professional 19 service limited liability company for pecuniary profit under this arti- 20 cle for the purpose of rendering the professional service or services as 21 such professionals are authorized to practice. With respect to a profes- 22 sional service limited liability company formed to provide medical 23 services as such services are defined in article 131 of the education 24 law, each member of such limited liability company must be licensed 25 pursuant to article 131 of the education law to practice medicine in 26 this state. With respect to a professional service limited liability 27 company formed to provide dental services as such services are defined 28 in article 133 of the education law, each member of such limited liabil- 29 ity company must be licensed pursuant to article 133 of the education 30 law to practice dentistry in this state. With respect to a professional 31 service limited liability company formed to provide veterinary services 32 as such services are defined in article 135 of the education law, each 33 member of such limited liability company must be licensed pursuant to 34 article 135 of the education law to practice veterinary medicine in this 35 state. With respect to a professional service limited liability company 36 formed to provide professional engineering, land surveying, architec- 37 tural, landscape architectural and/or geological services as such 38 services are defined in article 145, article 147 and article 148 of the 39 education law, each member of such limited liability company must be 40 licensed pursuant to article 145, article 147 and/or article 148 of the 41 education law to practice one or more of such professions in this state. 42 With respect to a professional service limited liability company formed 43 to provide licensed clinical social work services as such services are 44 defined in article 154 of the education law, each member of such limited 45 liability company shall be licensed pursuant to article 154 of the 46 education law to practice licensed clinical social work in this state. 47 With respect to a professional service limited liability company formed 48 to provide creative arts therapy services as such services are defined 49 in article 163 of the education law, each member of such limited liabil- 50 ity company must be licensed pursuant to article 163 of the education 51 law to practice creative arts therapy in this state. With respect to a 52 professional service limited liability company formed to provide 53 marriage and family therapy services as such services are defined in 54 article 163 of the education law, each member of such limited liability 55 company must be licensed pursuant to article 163 of the education law to 56 practice marriage and family therapy in this state. With respect to a S. 247 11 1 professional service limited liability company formed to provide mental 2 health counseling services as such services are defined in article 163 3 of the education law, each member of such limited liability company must 4 be licensed pursuant to article 163 of the education law to practice 5 mental health counseling in this state. With respect to a professional 6 service limited liability company formed to provide psychoanalysis 7 services as such services are defined in article 163 of the education 8 law, each member of such limited liability company must be licensed 9 pursuant to article 163 of the education law to practice psychoanalysis 10 in this state. With respect to a professional service limited liability 11 company formed to provide applied behavior analysis services as such 12 services are defined in article 167 of the education law, each member of 13 such limited liability company must be licensed or certified pursuant to 14 article 167 of the education law to practice applied behavior analysis 15 in this state. With respect to a professional service limited liability 16 company formed to provide vision impairment specialist services as such 17 services are defined in article 169 of the education law, each member of 18 such limited liability company must be licensed pursuant to article 169 19 of the education law to practice as a vision impairment specialist in 20 this state. In addition to engaging in such profession or professions, a 21 professional service limited liability company may engage in any other 22 business or activities as to which a limited liability company may be 23 formed under section two hundred one of this chapter. Notwithstanding 24 any other provision of this section, a professional service limited 25 liability company (i) authorized to practice law may only engage in 26 another profession or business or activities or (ii) which is engaged in 27 a profession or other business or activities other than law may only 28 engage in the practice of law, to the extent not prohibited by any other 29 law of this state or any rule adopted by the appropriate appellate divi- 30 sion of the supreme court or the court of appeals. 31 § 7. Subdivision (b) of section 1207 of the limited liability company 32 law, as amended by chapter 701 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 33 as follows: 34 (b) With respect to a professional service limited liability company 35 formed to provide medical services as such services are defined in arti- 36 cle 131 of the education law, each member of such limited liability 37 company must be licensed pursuant to article 131 of the education law to 38 practice medicine in this state. With respect to a professional service 39 limited liability company formed to provide dental services as such 40 services are defined in article 133 of the education law, each member of 41 such limited liability company must be licensed pursuant to article 133 42 of the education law to practice dentistry in this state. With respect 43 to a professional service limited liability company formed to provide 44 veterinary services as such services are defined in article 135 of the 45 education law, each member of such limited liability company must be 46 licensed pursuant to article 135 of the education law to practice veter- 47 inary medicine in this state. With respect to a professional service 48 limited liability company formed to provide professional engineering, 49 land surveying, architectural, landscape architectural and/or geological 50 services as such services are defined in article 145, article 147 and 51 article 148 of the education law, each member of such limited liability 52 company must be licensed pursuant to article 145, article 147 and/or 53 article 148 of the education law to practice one or more of such 54 professions in this state. With respect to a professional service limit- 55 ed liability company formed to provide public accountancy services as 56 such services are defined in article 149 of the education law each S. 247 12 1 member of such limited liability company whose principal place of busi- 2 ness is in this state and who provides public accountancy services, must 3 be licensed pursuant to article 149 of the education law to practice 4 public accountancy in this state. With respect to a professional service 5 limited liability company formed to provide licensed clinical social 6 work services as such services are defined in article 154 of the educa- 7 tion law, each member of such limited liability company shall be 8 licensed pursuant to article 154 of the education law to practice 9 licensed clinical social work in this state. With respect to a profes- 10 sional service limited liability company formed to provide creative arts 11 therapy services as such services are defined in article 163 of the 12 education law, each member of such limited liability company must be 13 licensed pursuant to article 163 of the education law to practice crea- 14 tive arts therapy in this state. With respect to a professional service 15 limited liability company formed to provide marriage and family therapy 16 services as such services are defined in article 163 of the education 17 law, each member of such limited liability company must be licensed 18 pursuant to article 163 of the education law to practice marriage and 19 family therapy in this state. With respect to a professional service 20 limited liability company formed to provide mental health counseling 21 services as such services are defined in article 163 of the education 22 law, each member of such limited liability company must be licensed 23 pursuant to article 163 of the education law to practice mental health 24 counseling in this state. With respect to a professional service limited 25 liability company formed to provide psychoanalysis services as such 26 services are defined in article 163 of the education law, each member of 27 such limited liability company must be licensed pursuant to article 163 28 of the education law to practice psychoanalysis in this state. With 29 respect to a professional service limited liability company formed to 30 provide applied behavior analysis services as such services are defined 31 in article 167 of the education law, each member of such limited liabil- 32 ity company must be licensed or certified pursuant to article 167 of the 33 education law to practice applied behavior analysis in this state. A 34 professional service limited liability company formed to lawfully engage 35 in the practice of public accountancy as a firm, as such practice is 36 defined under article 149 of the education law shall be required to show 37 (1) that a simple majority of the ownership of the firm, in terms of 38 financial interests and voting rights held by the firm's owners, belongs 39 to individuals licensed to practice public accountancy in some state, 40 and (2) that all members of a limited professional service limited 41 liability company, whose principal place of business is in this state, 42 and who are engaged in the practice of public accountancy in this state, 43 hold a valid license issued under section seventy-four hundred four of 44 the education law. For purposes of this subdivision, "financial inter- 45 est" means capital stock, capital accounts, capital contributions, capi- 46 tal interest, or interest in undistributed earnings of a business enti- 47 ty. Although firms registered with the education department may include 48 non-licensee owners, a registered firm and its owners must comply with 49 rules promulgated by the state board of regents. Notwithstanding the 50 foregoing, a firm registered with the education department may not have 51 non-licensee owners if the firm's name includes the words "certified 52 public accountant," or "certified public accountants," or the abbrevi- 53 ations "CPA" or "CPAs". Each non-licensee owner of a firm that is regis- 54 tered under this section shall be (1) a natural person who actively 55 participates in the business of the firm or its affiliated entities, or 56 (2) an entity, including, but not limited to, a partnership or profes- S. 247 13 1 sional corporation, provided each beneficial owner of an equity interest 2 in such entity is a natural person who actively participates in the 3 business conducted by the firm or its affiliated entities. For purposes 4 of this subdivision, "actively participate" means to provide services to 5 clients or to otherwise individually take part in the day-to-day busi- 6 ness or management of the firm or an affiliated entity. With respect to 7 a professional service limited liability company formed to provide 8 vision impairment specialist services as such services are defined in 9 article 169 of the education law, each member of such limited liability 10 company must be licensed pursuant to article 169 of the education law to 11 practice as a vision impairment specialist in this state. 12 § 8. Subdivision (a) of section 1301 of the limited liability company 13 law, as amended by chapter 701 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 14 as follows: 15 (a) "Foreign professional service limited liability company" means a 16 professional service limited liability company, whether or not denomi- 17 nated as such, organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than 18 this state, (i) each of whose members and managers, if any, is a profes- 19 sional authorized by law to render a professional service within this 20 state and who is or has been engaged in the practice of such profession 21 in such professional service limited liability company or a predecessor 22 entity, or will engage in the practice of such profession in the profes- 23 sional service limited liability company within thirty days of the date 24 such professional becomes a member, or each of whose members and manag- 25 ers, if any, is a professional at least one of such members is author- 26 ized by law to render a professional service within this state and who 27 is or has been engaged in the practice of such profession in such 28 professional service limited liability company or a predecessor entity, 29 or will engage in the practice of such profession in the professional 30 service limited liability company within thirty days of the date such 31 professional becomes a member, or (ii) authorized by, or holding a 32 license, certificate, registration or permit issued by the licensing 33 authority pursuant to, the education law to render a professional 34 service within this state; except that all members and managers, if any, 35 of a foreign professional service limited liability company that 36 provides health services in this state shall be licensed in this state. 37 With respect to a foreign professional service limited liability company 38 which provides veterinary services as such services are defined in arti- 39 cle 135 of the education law, each member of such foreign professional 40 service limited liability company shall be licensed pursuant to article 41 135 of the education law to practice veterinary medicine. With respect 42 to a foreign professional service limited liability company which 43 provides medical services as such services are defined in article 131 of 44 the education law, each member of such foreign professional service 45 limited liability company must be licensed pursuant to article 131 of 46 the education law to practice medicine in this state. With respect to a 47 foreign professional service limited liability company which provides 48 dental services as such services are defined in article 133 of the 49 education law, each member of such foreign professional service limited 50 liability company must be licensed pursuant to article 133 of the educa- 51 tion law to practice dentistry in this state. With respect to a foreign 52 professional service limited liability company which provides profes- 53 sional engineering, land surveying, geologic, architectural and/or land- 54 scape architectural services as such services are defined in article 55 145, article 147 and article 148 of the education law, each member of 56 such foreign professional service limited liability company must be S. 247 14 1 licensed pursuant to article 145, article 147 and/or article 148 of the 2 education law to practice one or more of such professions in this state. 3 With respect to a foreign professional service limited liability company 4 which provides public accountancy services as such services are defined 5 in article 149 of the education law, each member of such foreign profes- 6 sional service limited liability company whose principal place of busi- 7 ness is in this state and who provides public accountancy services, 8 shall be licensed pursuant to article 149 of the education law to prac- 9 tice public accountancy in this state. With respect to a foreign profes- 10 sional service limited liability company which provides licensed clin- 11 ical social work services as such services are defined in article 154 of 12 the education law, each member of such foreign professional service 13 limited liability company shall be licensed pursuant to article 154 of 14 the education law to practice clinical social work in this state. With 15 respect to a foreign professional service limited liability company 16 which provides creative arts therapy services as such services are 17 defined in article 163 of the education law, each member of such foreign 18 professional service limited liability company must be licensed pursuant 19 to article 163 of the education law to practice creative arts therapy in 20 this state. With respect to a foreign professional service limited 21 liability company which provides marriage and family therapy services as 22 such services are defined in article 163 of the education law, each 23 member of such foreign professional service limited liability company 24 must be licensed pursuant to article 163 of the education law to prac- 25 tice marriage and family therapy in this state. With respect to a 26 foreign professional service limited liability company which provides 27 mental health counseling services as such services are defined in arti- 28 cle 163 of the education law, each member of such foreign professional 29 service limited liability company must be licensed pursuant to article 30 163 of the education law to practice mental health counseling in this 31 state. With respect to a foreign professional service limited liability 32 company which provides psychoanalysis services as such services are 33 defined in article 163 of the education law, each member of such foreign 34 professional service limited liability company must be licensed pursuant 35 to article 163 of the education law to practice psychoanalysis in this 36 state. With respect to a foreign professional service limited liability 37 company which provides applied behavior analysis services as such 38 services are defined in article 167 of the education law, each member of 39 such foreign professional service limited liability company must be 40 licensed or certified pursuant to article 167 of the education law to 41 practice applied behavior analysis in this state. A foreign professional 42 service limited liability company formed to lawfully engage in the prac- 43 tice of public accountancy as a firm, as such practice is defined under 44 article 149 of the education law shall be required to show (1) that a 45 simple majority of the ownership of the firm, in terms of financial 46 interests and voting rights held by the firm's owners, belongs to indi- 47 viduals licensed to practice public accountancy in some state, and (2) 48 that all members of a foreign limited professional service limited 49 liability company, whose principal place of business is in this state, 50 and who are engaged in the practice of public accountancy in this state, 51 hold a valid license issued under section seventy-four hundred four of 52 the education law. For purposes of this subdivision, "financial inter- 53 est" means capital stock, capital accounts, capital contributions, capi- 54 tal interest, or interest in undistributed earnings of a business enti- 55 ty. Although firms registered with the education department may include 56 non-licensee owners, a registered firm and its owners must comply with S. 247 15 1 rules promulgated by the state board of regents. Notwithstanding the 2 foregoing, a firm registered with the education department may not have 3 non-licensee owners if the firm's name includes the words "certified 4 public accountant," or "certified public accountants," or the abbrevi- 5 ations "CPA" or "CPAs". Each non-licensee owner of a firm that is regis- 6 tered under this section shall be (1) a natural person who actively 7 participates in the business of the firm or its affiliated entities, or 8 (2) an entity, including, but not limited to, a partnership or profes- 9 sional corporation, provided each beneficial owner of an equity interest 10 in such entity is a natural person who actively participates in the 11 business conducted by the firm or its affiliated entities. For purposes 12 of this subdivision, "actively participate" means to provide services to 13 clients or to otherwise individually take part in the day-to-day busi- 14 ness or management of the firm or an affiliated entity. With respect to 15 a foreign professional service limited liability company which provides 16 vision impairment specialist services as such services are defined in 17 article 169 of the education law, each member of such foreign profes- 18 sional service limited liability company must be licensed pursuant to 19 article 169 of the education law to practice as a vision impairment 20 specialist in this state. 21 § 9. Subdivision (q) of section 121-1500 of the partnership law, as 22 amended by chapter 701 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 (q) Each partner of a registered limited liability partnership formed 25 to provide medical services in this state must be licensed pursuant to 26 article 131 of the education law to practice medicine in this state and 27 each partner of a registered limited liability partnership formed to 28 provide dental services in this state must be licensed pursuant to arti- 29 cle 133 of the education law to practice dentistry in this state. Each 30 partner of a registered limited liability partnership formed to provide 31 veterinary services in this state must be licensed pursuant to article 32 135 of the education law to practice veterinary medicine in this state. 33 Each partner of a registered limited liability partnership formed to 34 provide public accountancy services as a firm, whose principal place of 35 business is in this state and who provides public accountancy services, 36 must be licensed pursuant to article 149 of the education law to prac- 37 tice public accountancy in this state. Each partner of a registered 38 limited liability partnership formed to provide professional engineer- 39 ing, land surveying, geological services, architectural and/or landscape 40 architectural services in this state must be licensed pursuant to arti- 41 cle 145, article 147 and/or article 148 of the education law to practice 42 one or more of such professions in this state. Each partner of a regis- 43 tered limited liability partnership formed to provide licensed clinical 44 social work services in this state must be licensed pursuant to article 45 154 of the education law to practice clinical social work in this state. 46 Each partner of a registered limited liability partnership formed to 47 provide creative arts therapy services in this state must be licensed 48 pursuant to article 163 of the education law to practice creative arts 49 therapy in this state. Each partner of a registered limited liability 50 partnership formed to provide marriage and family therapy services in 51 this state must be licensed pursuant to article 163 of the education law 52 to practice marriage and family therapy in this state. Each partner of a 53 registered limited liability partnership formed to provide mental health 54 counseling services in this state must be licensed pursuant to article 55 163 of the education law to practice mental health counseling in this 56 state. Each partner of a registered limited liability partnership formed S. 247 16 1 to provide psychoanalysis services in this state must be licensed pursu- 2 ant to article 163 of the education law to practice psychoanalysis in 3 this state. Each partner of a registered limited liability partnership 4 formed to provide applied behavior analysis service in this state must 5 be licensed or certified pursuant to article 167 of the education law to 6 practice applied behavior analysis in this state. A registered limited 7 liability partnership formed to lawfully engage in the practice of 8 public accountancy as a firm, as such practice is defined under article 9 149 of the education law, shall be required to show (1) that a simple 10 majority of the ownership of the firm, in terms of financial interests 11 and voting rights held by the firm's owners, belongs to individuals 12 licensed to practice public accountancy in some state, and (2) that all 13 partners of a limited liability partnership whose principal place of 14 business is in this state, and who are engaged in the practice of public 15 accountancy in this state, hold a valid license issued under section 16 seventy-four hundred four of the education law. For purposes of this 17 subdivision, "financial interest" means capital stock, capital accounts, 18 capital contributions, capital interest, or interest in undistributed 19 earnings of a business entity. Although firms registered with the educa- 20 tion department may include non-licensee owners, the firm and its owners 21 must comply with rules promulgated by the state board of regents. 22 Notwithstanding the foregoing, a firm registered with the education 23 department may not have non-licensee owners if the firm's name includes 24 the words "certified public accountant," or "certified public accounts," 25 or the abbreviations "CPA" or "CPAs". Each non-licensee owner of a firm 26 that is formed under this section shall be (1) a natural person who 27 actively participates in the business of the firm or its affiliated 28 entities, or (2) an entity, including, but not limited to, a partnership 29 or professional corporation, provided each beneficial owner of an equity 30 interest in such entity is a natural person who actively participates in 31 the business conducted by the firm or its affiliated entities. For 32 purposes of this subdivision, "actively participate" means to provide 33 services to clients or to otherwise individually take part in the day- 34 to-day business or management of the firm or an affiliated entity. Each 35 partner of a registered limited liability partnership formed to provide 36 vision impairment specialist services in this state must be licensed or 37 certified pursuant to article 169 of the education law to practice as a 38 vision impairment specialist in this state. 39 § 10. Subdivision (q) of section 121-1502 of the partnership law, as 40 amended by chapter 701 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 41 follows: 42 (q) Each partner of a foreign limited liability partnership which 43 provides medical services in this state must be licensed pursuant to 44 article 131 of the education law to practice medicine in the state and 45 each partner of a foreign limited liability partnership which provides 46 dental services in the state must be licensed pursuant to article 133 of 47 the education law to practice dentistry in this state. Each partner of a 48 foreign limited liability partnership which provides veterinary service 49 in the state shall be licensed pursuant to article 135 of the education 50 law to practice veterinary medicine in this state. Each partner of a 51 foreign limited liability partnership which provides professional engi- 52 neering, land surveying, geological services, architectural and/or land- 53 scape architectural services in this state must be licensed pursuant to 54 article 145, article 147 and/or article 148 of the education law to 55 practice one or more of such professions. Each partner of a foreign 56 limited liability partnership formed to provide public accountancy S. 247 17 1 services as a firm, whose principal place of business is in this state 2 and who provides public accountancy services, must be licensed pursuant 3 to article 149 of the education law to practice public accountancy in 4 this state. Each partner of a foreign limited liability partnership 5 which provides licensed clinical social work services in this state must 6 be licensed pursuant to article 154 of the education law to practice 7 licensed clinical social work in this state. Each partner of a foreign 8 limited liability partnership which provides creative arts therapy 9 services in this state must be licensed pursuant to article 163 of the 10 education law to practice creative arts therapy in this state. Each 11 partner of a foreign limited liability partnership which provides 12 marriage and family therapy services in this state must be licensed 13 pursuant to article 163 of the education law to practice marriage and 14 family therapy in this state. Each partner of a foreign limited liabil- 15 ity partnership which provides mental health counseling services in this 16 state must be licensed pursuant to article 163 of the education law to 17 practice mental health counseling in this state. Each partner of a 18 foreign limited liability partnership which provides psychoanalysis 19 services in this state must be licensed pursuant to article 163 of the 20 education law to practice psychoanalysis in this state. Each partner of 21 a foreign limited liability partnership which provides applied behavior 22 analysis services in this state must be licensed or certified pursuant 23 to article 167 of the education law to practice applied behavior analy- 24 sis in this state. A foreign limited liability partnership formed to 25 lawfully engage in the practice of public accountancy as a firm, as such 26 practice is defined under article 149 of the education law, shall be 27 required to show (1) that a simple majority of the ownership of the 28 firm, in terms of financial interests and voting rights held by the 29 firm's owners, belongs to individuals licensed to practice public 30 accountancy in some state, and (2) that all partners of the foreign 31 limited liability partnership whose principal place of business is in 32 this state, and who are engaged in the practice of public accountancy in 33 this state, hold a valid license issued under section seventy-four 34 hundred four of the education law. For purposes of this subdivision, 35 "financial interest" means capital stock, capital accounts, capital 36 contributions, capital interest, or interest in undistributed earnings 37 of a business entity. Although firms registered with the education 38 department may include non-licensee owners, a registered firm and its 39 owners must comply with rules promulgated by the state board of regents. 40 Notwithstanding the foregoing, a firm registered with the education 41 department may not have non-licensee owners if the firm's name includes 42 the words "certified public accountant," or "certified public account- 43 ants," or the abbreviations "CPA" or "CPAs". Each non-licensee owner of 44 a firm that is formed under this section shall be (1) a natural person 45 who actively participates in the business of the firm or its affiliated 46 entities, or (2) an entity, including, but not limited to, a partnership 47 or professional corporation, provided that each beneficial owner of an 48 equity interest in such entity is a natural person who actively partic- 49 ipates in the business conducted by the firm or its affiliated entities. 50 For purposes of this subdivision, "actively participate" means to 51 provide services to clients or to otherwise individually take part in 52 the day-to-day business or management of the firm or an affiliated enti- 53 ty. Each partner of a foreign limited liability partnership which 54 provides vision impairment specialist services in this state must be 55 licensed pursuant to article 169 of the education law to practice as a 56 vision impairment specialist in this state. S. 247 18 1 § 11. a. Nothing in this act shall be construed as prohibiting a 2 person from performing the duties of a licensed vision impairment 3 specialist, in the course of such employment, if such person is employed 4 by programs licensed, certified, operated, or funded and regulated by 5 the office of children and family services including the commission for 6 the blind and visually impaired, the state education department or the 7 department of health; provided, however, that this section shall not 8 authorize the use of any title authorized pursuant to article 169 of the 9 education law. 10 b. On or before September 1, 2026, each office identified in subdivi- 11 sion a of this section that licenses, certifies, operates or funds and 12 regulates programs that employ individuals to provide services that 13 would otherwise be restricted to individuals licensed or authorized 14 under article 169 of the education law, shall submit to the commissioner 15 of education, in such form and detail as requested by such commissioner, 16 data in relation to: the number of individuals employed in exempt 17 programs licensed, certified, operated, or funded and regulated by each 18 office identified in subdivision a of this section on September 1, 2025 19 who are providing services that would otherwise be restricted to those 20 licensed or authorized under article 169 of the education law; and the 21 occupational title of individuals who on July 1, 2026 are not licensed 22 or otherwise authorized under title 8 of the education law, and who are 23 engaged in the practice of vision impairment specialist for the purpose 24 of providing vision impairment specialist services to persons who are 25 blind or visually impaired. 26 c. The commissioner of education, after receipt of this data and in 27 consultation with the offices identified in subdivision a of this 28 section, in consultation with not-for-profit providers, professional 29 associations, consumers and other key stakeholders, shall prepare a 30 report that recommends changes in any laws, rules or regulations neces- 31 sary to ensure appropriate licensure or other authorization of individ- 32 uals providing services that are within the restricted practice of 33 professions licensed or otherwise authorized under article 169 of the 34 education law. Such report shall include an estimate of the fiscal 35 impact of any such recommended changes and, to the extent practicable, 36 how such recommendations will result in improved outcomes. The commis- 37 sioner of education shall submit the report to the governor, the speaker 38 of the assembly, the temporary president of the senate, and the chairs 39 of the senate and assembly higher education committees by January 1, 40 2027. The commissioners of the agencies identified in subdivision a of 41 this section shall be provided an opportunity to include statements or 42 alternative recommendations in such report. 43 § 12. This act shall take effect eighteen months after it shall have 44 become a law; provided, however, that if chapter 733 of the laws of 2023 45 shall not have taken effect on or before such date then sections 46 three-a, four-a and five-a of this act shall take effect on the same 47 date and in the same manner as such chapter of the laws of 2023 takes 48 effect; provided, further, that the provisions of subdivision a of 49 section eleven of this act shall expire July 1, 2027 when upon such date 50 the provisions of such subdivision shall be deemed repealed. The 51 commissioner of education and the board of regents are authorized to 52 promulgate such rules and regulations and take any other measures as may 53 be necessary for the timely implementation of this act on or before its 54 effective date, including but not limited to the appointment of the 55 state board for vision rehabilitation services, the acceptance and proc- 56 essing of applications for licensure, and the issuance of licenses.